Massachusetts, session 194th, H1121.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner of insurance shall conduct an investigation and study of the impact of property
insurance premiums on non-profit organizations. The commissioner shall evaluate, at a
minimum: (1) the reasons for increasing property insurance premiums in the commonwealth; (2)
the market availability of property insurers in the commonwealth for nonprofit organizations
including those considered "high-risk"; and (3) evaluate the development of a commercial
insurance policy clearinghouse as part of the Massachusetts FAIR Plan. The commissioner shall
make recommendations and shall submit findings to the joint committee on financial services
and to the house and senate committees on ways and means not later than December 31, 2026.
of 1